Hawaii, session 2026, GM1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Act 134, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2025, provides a temporary adjustment, until its
June 30, 2028, sunset date, to the department of education's
small purchase procurement capacity by exempting purchases of
local edible produce and packaged food products of less than
$250,000 from the electronic procurement system requirement and
instead requiring no less than three written quotes for those
purchases.
The legislature also finds that, as the largest department
in the State with two hundred ninety-six schools and forty-two
thousand salaried and part-time employees, the department of
education must procure voluminous amounts of goods and services
to run its operation.
The legislature further finds that the department of
education is mandated to provide at least thirty per cent
locally sourced foods to Hawaii's public schools by 2030.
Increasing the department's small purchase procurement capacity
2026-3507 HB2300 GDI HMSO
iinniiiinniiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2 H.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
for local edible produce and packaged food products will assist
the department in fulfilling its mandate to provide locally
sourced foods for the State's public schools.
The legislature notes, however, that to effectuate Act 134,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, the department requires that new
statutory language allow for small purchase procurement of more
than $100,000 for local edible produce and packaged food
products.
The purpose of this Act is to effectuate Act 134, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2025, by:
(1) Exempting department of education purchases of local
edible produce and packaged food products less than
$200,000 from the electronic procurement system; and
(2) Prohibiting the artificial division and parceling of
such procurements to be considered as small purchases.
SECTION 2. Section 302A-1317, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t] S302A-1317 [^] Local edible produce and packaged food
products procurement; small purchases. (a) Notwithstanding
section 103D-305 (a) and (c) and any other law to
the contrary, procurements of less than $200,000 for
2026-3507 HB2300 CDl HMSO 2

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
local edible produce and packaged food products for the
department shall be exempt from the requirement to conduct
procurements through an electronic system and shall instead be
subject to no less than three written quotes; provided that if
the department is unable to receive the required number of
written notifications as required by this section, written
justification shall be provided and kept by the department.
(b) Notwithstanding section 103D-305 (a), multiple
expenditures for procurements of local edible produce and
packaged food products made pursuant to this section shall not
be created at the inception of a transaction or project so as to
evade the requirements of chapter 103D; provided that
procurement requirements shall not be artificially divided or
parceled so as to constitute a small purchase.”
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval,
and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028.
2026-3507 HB2300 CDl HMSO
limiiiiiHiiinniinm

H.B. NO. 2300
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 8th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2300, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2300, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
124-26